Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-109
National Guard; units; location.

The location of units, including headquarters, shall be fixed by the Governor on the recommendation of the Adjutant General.

Laws 1929, c. 189, § 7, p. 659;

C.S.1929, § 55-112;

R.S.1943, § 55-110;

Laws 1969, c. 459, § 7, p. 1583.